Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-2,137
School district; development and adoption of bullying prevention and education policy; review.

(1) The Legislature finds and declares that:

(a) Bullying disrupts a school's ability to educate students; and

(b) Bullying threatens public safety by creating an atmosphere in which such behavior can escalate into violence.

(2) For purposes of this section, bullying means any ongoing pattern of physical, verbal, or electronic abuse on school grounds, in a vehicle owned, leased, or contracted by a school being used for a school purpose by a school employee or his or her designee, or at school-sponsored activities or school-sponsored athletic events.

(3) On or before July 1, 2009, each school district as defined in section 79-101 shall develop and adopt a policy concerning bullying prevention and education for all students.

(4) The school district shall review the policy annually.

Laws 2008, LB205, § 1.